Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6288.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 105d. (1) The department shall seek approval from the United States Department of Health and Human Services to do, without jeopardizing federal match dollars or otherwise incurring federal financial penalties, and upon on approval shall do, all of the following: (a) Enroll individuals eligible under section 1396a(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII) of title XIX who meet the citizenship provisions of 42 CFR 435.406 and who are otherwise eligible for the medical assistance program under this act into a contracted health plan. (b) Give enrollees described in subdivision (a) a choice in choosing among contracted health plans. (c) Ensure that all enrollees described in subdivision (a) have access to a primary care practitioner who is licensed, registered, or otherwise authorized to engage in the primary care practitioner's health care profession in this state and to preventive services. The department shall require that all new enrollees be assigned and have scheduled an initial appointment with their primary care practitioner within 60 days of initial enrollment. The department shall require a contracted health plan to spend not less than 12% of its overall annual health care spending on primary care spending over the course of 8 years after the effective date of the amendatory act that added section 105k. The department shall monitor and track contracted health plans for compliance in this area with this subdivision and consider that compliance in any health plan incentive programs. The department shall ensure that the contracted health plans have procedures to ensure that the privacy of the enrollees' personal information is protected in accordance with the health insurance portability and accountability act of 1996, Public Law 104-191. (d) Establish cost sharing requirements for enrollees described in subsection (1)(a) subdivision (a) as approved by the United States Department of Health and Human Services. (e) Implement a plan to encourage use of high-value services, while discouraging low-value services such as nonurgent emergency department use. (f) Develop incentives for enrollees and providers who assist the department in detecting fraud and abuse in the medical assistance program. The department shall provide an annual report that includes the type of fraud detected, the amount saved, and the outcome of the investigation to the legislature. (g) Allow for services provided by telemedicine from a practitioner who is licensed, registered, or otherwise authorized under section 16171 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.16171, to engage in the practitioner's health care profession in the state where the patient is located. (2) For services rendered to an uninsured individual, a hospital that participates in the medical assistance program under this act shall accept 115% of Medicare rates as payments in full from an uninsured individual with an annual income level up to 250% of the federal poverty guidelines. (3) The department shall develop and implement a plan to enroll all existing fee-for-service enrollees into contracted health plans if allowable by law, if the medical assistance program is the primary payer and if that enrollment is cost-effective. This includes all newly eligible enrollees as described in subsection (1)(a). The department shall include contracted health plans as the mandatory delivery system in its waiver request. The department shall identify all remaining populations eligible for managed care, develop plans for their integration into managed care, and provide recommendations for a performance bonus incentive plan mechanism for long-term care managed care providers that are consistent with other managed care performance bonus incentive plans. The department shall make recommendations for a performance bonus incentive plan for long-term care managed care providers of up to 3% of their Medicaid capitation payments, consistent with other managed care performance bonus incentive plans. These payments shall must comply with federal requirements and shall be based on measures that identify the appropriate use of long-term care services and that focus on consumer satisfaction, consumer choice, and other appropriate quality measures applicable to community-based and nursing home services. (4) The department shall implement a pharmaceutical benefit to encourage the use of high-value, low-cost prescriptions, such as generic prescriptions when such an alternative exists for a branded product and 90-day prescription supplies, as recommended by the enrollee's prescribing provider and as is consistent with section 109h and sections 9701 to 9709 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.9701 to 333.9709. (5) The department in collaboration with the contracted health plans shall create financial incentives for enrollees who demonstrate improved health outcomes, practice healthy behaviors, or complete screenings or procedures that improve health outcomes. (6) The performance bonus incentive pool for contracted health plans shall must include targets established for at least 3 and no more than 5 objectives established by the department in collaboration with the contracted health plans. Targets should focus on key current health priorities, improve health equity, utilize established measurements to set a baseline for performance improvement, and be determined at least 6 months before the measurement period to support planning and execution necessary for achievement of desired outcomes. (7) The department shall ensure that all capitated payments made to contracted health plans are actuarially sound. This subsection applies whether or not either or both of the waivers requested under this section are approved, the patient protection and affordable care act is repealed, or the state terminates or opts out of the program established under this section. (8) The department shall withhold, at a minimum, 0.75% of payments to contracted health plans, except for specialty prepaid health plans, for the purpose of expanding the existing performance bonus incentive pool. Distribution of funds from the performance bonus incentive pool is contingent on the contracted health plan's completion of the required performance or compliance metrics. (9) The department may measure contracted health plan or specialty prepaid health plan performance metrics, as applicable, on application of standards of care as that relates to appropriate treatment of substance use disorders and efforts to reduce substance use disorders. (10) The department shall make available at least 3 years of state medical assistance program data, without charge, to any vendor considered qualified by the department who indicates interest in submitting proposals to contracted health plans in order to implement cost savings and population health improvement opportunities through the use of innovative information and data management technologies. Any program or proposal to the contracted health plans must be consistent with the state's goals of improving health, increasing the quality, reliability, availability, and continuity of care, and reducing the cost of care of the eligible population of enrollees described in subsection (1)(a). The use of the data described in this subsection for the purpose of assessing the potential opportunity and subsequent development and submission of formal proposals to contracted health plans is not a cost or contractual obligation to the department or the state. (11) For the purposes of submitting reports and other information or data required under this section only, "legislature" means the senate majority leader, the speaker of the house of representatives, the chairs of the senate and house of representatives appropriations committees, the chairs of the senate and house of representatives appropriations subcommittees on the department budget, and the chairs of the senate and house of representatives standing committees on health policy. (12) As used in this section: (a) "Patient protection and affordable care act" means the patient protection and affordable care act, Public Law 111-148, as amended by the federal health care and education reconciliation act of 2010, Public Law 111-152. (b) "Telemedicine" means that term as defined in section 3476 of the insurance code of 1956, 1956 PA 218, MCL 500.3476. Sec. 105k. (1) By April 1, 2027 and by April 1 of each year thereafter, a contracted health plan shall submit a report to the department, in the form and manner prescribed by the department, that includes all of the following information: (a) The percentage of the contracted health plan's overall annual health care spending for the immediately preceding calendar year that constituted primary care spending. (b) If the percentage reported under subdivision (a) is less than 12%, 1 of the following: (i) A plan to increase primary care spending as a percentage of overall annual health care spending by at least 1% per year. (ii) If the contracted health plan previously submitted a plan described in subparagraph (i), both of the following: (A) Any modifications to that plan. (B) A description of the steps taken to date to increase the contracted health plan's proportion of primary care spending. (2) The department may promulgate rules to implement this section pursuant to the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. (3) As used in this section, "primary care spending" means spending on a professional service billed by a physician practicing primary care, including, but not limited to, spending on a professional claim, an evaluation and management visit, a preventative visit, care transition or coordination of services, and an in-office preventative service, screening, or counseling, and is calculated annually in the Medical Expenditure Panel Survey by the Department of Health and Human Services Agency for Healthcare Research and Quality.